Utah statutes.
32A-12-213 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful bringing onto premises for
consumption.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a person may not bring for on-
premise consumption an alcoholic beverage onto the premises of:
(a)  a licensed or unlicensed restaurant;
(b)  a licensed or unlicensed club;
(c)  an airport lounge licensee;
(d)  an on-premise banquet licensee;
(e)  an on-premise beer retailer licensee;
(f)  a resort licensee;
(g)  a sublicense of a resort licensee;
(h)  an event where an alcoholic beverage is sold or served under a single
event permit or temporary special event beer permit issued under this title;
or
(i)  any establishment open to the general public.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the following may not allow a
person to bring onto its premises an alcoholic beverage for on-premise
consumption or allow consumption of an alcoholic beverage brought onto its
premises in violation of this section:
(a)  a licensed or unlicensed restaurant;
(b)  a licensed or unlicensed club;
(c)  an airport lounge licensee;
(d)  an on-premise banquet licensee;
(e)  a resort licensee in relationship to:
(i)  the boundary of a resort building; or
(ii)  a sublicense premises;
(f)  a person operating a sublicense of a resort license;
(g)  an on-premise beer retailer licensee;
(h)  a holder of a single event permit or temporary special event beer permit
issued under this title; or
(i)  an officer, manager, employee, or agent of a person listed in Subsections
(2)(a) through (h).
(3) (a)  A person may bring bottled wine onto the premises of a restaurant
liquor licensee, limited restaurant licensee, resort spa sublicense, or club
licensee and consume the wine pursuant to the applicable restrictions
contained in Subsection 32A-4-106(14), 32A-4-307(14), 32A-4a-305(22), or
32A-5-107 (18).
(b) A passenger of a limousine may bring onto, have, and consume an alcoholic
beverage on the limousine if:
(i)  the travel of the limousine begins and ends at:
(A)  the residence of the passenger;
(B)  the hotel of the passenger, if the passenger is a registered guest of the
hotel; or
(C)  the temporary domicile of the passenger; and
(ii)  the driver of the limousine is separated from the passengers by
partition or other means approved by the department.
(c) A passenger of a chartered bus may bring onto, have, and consume an
alcoholic beverage on the chartered bus:
(i) (A)  but may consume only during travel to a specified destination of the
chartered bus and not during travel back to the place where the travel begins;
or
(B)  if the travel of the chartered bus begins and ends at:
(I)  the residence of the passenger;
(II)  the hotel of the passenger, if the passenger is a registered guest of
the hotel; or
(III)  the temporary domicile of the passenger; and
(ii)  the chartered bus has a nondrinking designee other than the driver
traveling on the chartered bus to monitor consumption.
(d) A person may bring onto any premises, have, and consume an alcoholic
beverage at a privately hosted event that is not open to the general public.
(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c)(i)(A), the consumption of an
alcoholic beverage in a limousine or chartered bus is not allowed if the
limousine or chartered bus drops off a passenger at a location from which the
passenger departs in a private vehicle.
